Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 4
HOUSING

Cross references:

For cooperation with the federal government regarding housing projects, see article 55 of title 24; for relocation assistance and land acquisition policies, see article 56 of title 24.

Section

PART 1 CITY HOUSING LAW -
SLUM CLEARANCE

PART 2 CREATING HOUSING AUTHORITIES

PART 3 REHABILITATION ACT OF 1945

PART 4 VETERANS' HOUSING

PART 5 COUNTY HOUSING AUTHORITY

PART 6 PUBLIC HOUSING - ELECTION

PART 7 HOUSING AND BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT
AND FINANCING

PART 8 ALLOCATION OF QUALIFIED
MORTGAGE BONDS

PART 9 COLORADO RENTAL ASSISTANCE
DEMONSTRATION PROGRAM

PART 10 RENT REPORTING FOR CREDIT PILOT PROGRAM

PART 11 MIDDLE-INCOME HOUSING AUTHORITY